Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20162-1074
Definitions, where
found.

For purposes of the Plant Protection and
Plant Pest Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found
in sections 2-1074.01 to 2-1089 shall be used.

Laws 1988, LB 874, § 3;

Laws 1993, LB 406, § 2;

Laws 2008, LB791, § 2;

Laws 2013, LB68, § 2.